HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
акцентувати/ABGH
аналізувати/ABGH
ангажувати/ABGH
асимілювати/ABGH
базарювати/AB
балансувати/ABGH
бачити/ABGHCD
благословляти/IJGH
бляхувати/ABGH
бовкнути/ABEF
борознувати/ABGH
брити/IJGH
бушувати/AB
вагуватися/BH
вантажити/ABCD
вапнувати/ABGH
варити/ABEFGH
ввічнити/AB
ввозити/ABCDGH
вдостоїти/ABCD
вдувати/IJGH
вдягнути/ABEF
вернути/ABEF
верстати/IJGH
вживляти/IJGH
вибризкувати/AB
вивантажити/ABCD
вивергати/IJGH
вивітрити/ABEF
виводити/ABCDGH
вигартувати/AB
вигвинтити/ABEF
виглядати/IGJH
виглянути/ACBD
виготовити/ABCD
вигулювати/AGBH
видержувати/ABGH
виділити/ABEF
визнавати/ABGH
визублювати/AB
викинути/ABCD
викликати/ABIJGH
викорінити/ABEF
викорінювати/AB
викупити/ABEF
вилікувати/AB
вимагати/IJGH
виморозити/AB
виносити/ABCDGH
виокремлювати/ABGH
випалити/ABEF
виплавити/ABCD
виплатити/ABEF
виплачувати/ABGH
випросити/ABEF
випрошувати/ABGH
випрямлювати/AB
вирівнювати/ABGH
висвітлити/ABEF
висвітлювати/ABGH
виселяти/IJGH
висовувати/ABGH
виспівувати/AB
виставити/ABCD
висунути/ABCD
витісняти/IJGH
виткнути/ABEF
витлумачувати/AB
витріщити/ABCD
вихлюпувати/AB
вичавити/ABCD
вишкрябувати/AB
виштовхнути/ABEF
виштовхувати/ABGH
відвідувати/ABGH
відводити/ABCDGH
відгладити/ABCD
відділити/ABEF
віддячувати/AB
віджимати/IJGH
відкинути/ABCD
відкорковувати/AB
відкотити/ABEF
відливати/IJGH
відлучити/ABEF
відмітити/ABCD
відновляти/IJGH
відпороти/AB
відроджувати/ABGH
відсвіжувати/AB
відселити/ABEF
відступати/IJGH
відсунути/ABCD
відтискувати/AB
відтиснути/ABEF
відхаркувати/ABGH
відчинити/ABEF
відшарувати/AB
вінчати/IJGH
вкинути/ABCD
включати/IJGHOP
вколотити/ABEF
вкорочувати/ABGH
вмочити/ABEF
водити/ABEFGH
воєнізувати/AB
ворухнути/ABEF
впорскуватися/B
всипати/ABIJGH
всміхнутися/BF
вспокоїти/ABCD
встановити/ABEF
втопити/ABEF
втратити/ABCD
втулити/AB
вчинити/ABEF
вшановувати/ABGH
ганьбити/ABGH
глумитися/BF
гніздити/ABGH
говорити/ABEFGH
готувати/ABGH
градуювати/AB
грозити/ABEFGH
девальвувати/ABGH
денонсуватися/B
дернути/ABEF
дехлорувати/ABGH
добавитися/BD
доварити/ABEF
довбати/IJGH
довозити/AB
докупляти/IJGH
долизуватися/B
долучити/ABEF
домучити/ABCD
допрошувати/AB
досидіти/ABEF
досліджувати/ABGH
доточити/ABEF
доукомплектувати/AB
дубити/ABGH
душити/ABEFGH
економити/ABCDGH
жалитися/B
жаліти/IJGH
забігати/IJGH
забризкуватися/B
завантажити/ABCD
завозити/ABCDGH
завчити/ABEF
загартовувати/AB
заглибити/ABCD
загорнути/ABEF
загортати/IJGH
заготовити/ABCD
задивитися/BF
зажурити/ABEF
зазначити/ABCD
закльовувати/AB
законопатити/ABCD
закріплювати/ABGH
закрутити/ABEF
закурюватися/B
залишити/ABCDEF
замирити/AB
замислити/ABEF
заморозити/ABCD
заносити/ABCDGH
запалювати/AB
запасати/IJGH
запевнити/AEBF
заплющити/ABCD
заполонити/ABEF
запрасувати/AB
запустити/ABEF
засвідчити/ABEF
засвоїти/ABCD
засилити/AB
засівати/IJGH
засмажити/ABCD
засмітити/ABEF
заспокоїти/ABCD
застелити/ABEF
застрілювати/AB
засунути/ABCD
затемнити/ABEF
затьмарити/ABCD
затоплювати/ABGH
затулити/ABEF
затурбувати/AB
заходити/ABCDGH
захопити/ABEF
зачохлити/ABEF
зашифровувати/AB
зашпилити/ABCD
збирати/IJGH
зважити/ABCD
звалити/ABEF
зварювати/AB
звірити/ABCD
звозити/ABCDGH
зворушити/ABEF
зглянути/ABD
згорнути/ABEF
здержуватися/B
здригнути/ABEF
зігрівати/IJGH
зіставити/ABCD
злити/ABEF
злостити/AB
зміїтися/BD
змінити/ABEF
знайомити/ABCDGH
значити/ABGH
зневірити/ABCD
зневоднюватися/B
знівечити/ABCD
зрешетити/ABEF
зрівноважитися/B
зростати/IJGH
зсунути/ABCD
зумовити/ABCD
зустрінути/ABCD
зчинити/ABEF
індексувати/ABGH
інкрустувати/AB
капсулювати/ABGH
кінчити/ABEF
клеїти/ABCDGH
клеймуватися/B
коливати/IJGH
кооперувати/ABGH
коптити/ABEFGH
коректувати/AB
кришити/ABEFGH
купити/ABEF
кучерявити/ABCD
легітимізувати/ABGHOP
легувати/AB
лопнути/ABEF
лущити/ABCDGH
матеріалізувати/AB
махнути/ABEF
маячити/ABCD
минати/IJGH
місити/ABEFGH
мітити/ABCD
монетизувати/ABGH
морочити/ABCD
мучити/ABCDGH
м'якшити/ABGH
наважити/ABCD
нав'ючити/ABCD
нагнути/ABEF
нагрівати/IJGH
нагромаджувати/AB
нагромадити/ABCD
наклеїти/ABCD
накопичити/AB
накосити/ABEF
накрутити/ABEF
наливати/IJGH
намилити/ABCD
наносити/ABEF
напакувати/AB
направити/ABCD
напустити/ABEF
наскучити/AB
насмальцьовувати/IJGH
насмілитися/BD
насмішити/ABEF
насунути/ABCD
наточити/ABEF
нахлюпувати/AB
націдити/ABEF
націлити/ABCD
нівечити/AB
носити/ABEFGH
ночувати/ABGH
обіграватися/B
обіймати/IJGH
обклеїти/ABCD
облизнути/ABEF
обмірити/ABCD
обмотувати/AB
обпарити/ABCD
обробити/ABEFGH
обсипати/ABIJGH
обставити/ABCD
обсушувати/AB
обходити/ABCDGH
одурманити/ABCD
одчепити/ABEF
одягати/IJGH
озеленювати/AB
ознайомити/ABCD
опинитися/BF
оправити/ABCD
опрацьовувати/ABGH
орати/ABGH
освоїти/ABCD
ославити/ABCD
оступитися/BF
оточити/ABEF
охоплювати/ABGH
паплюжити/ABCD
пародіювати/ABGH
патрулювати/ABGH
переважити/ABCD
перевалити/ABEF
перевісити/ABCD
перевозити/ABCDGH
перегавкуватися/B
переглянути/ABCD
перезапустити/ABEF
перекладати/IJGH
перековувати/AB
перем'яти/AB
переносити/ABEFGH
переозброїти/ABCD
переоцінювати/ABGH
переправити/ABCD
перепрофілювати/AB
переселити/ABEF
перескакувати/ABGH
переставити/ABCD
перетнути/ABEF
пиячити/ABCD
підбирати/IJGH
підвернути/ABEF
підвішувати/AB
підводити/ABCD
підкріпляти/IJGH
підломити/ABEF
підмінити/ABEF
підносити/ABCD
підсмажувати/AB
підстригати/IJGH
підступити/ABEF
підсунути/ABCD
плутати/IJGH
плющити/AB
повеселити/ABEF
повісити/ABCD
погіршити/AB
погрозити/ABEF
подавати/ABGH
позаплющувати/AB
позбавити/ABCD
позолотити/ABEF
покоїти/ABCD
покуритися/B
помолитися/BF
помпувати/ABGH
понакручувати/AB
понизити/ABCD
попідголювати/AB
порочити/ABCD
поручити/ABEF
порядкуватися/B
поставляти/IJGH
поступити/ABEF
потіснити/AB
потішити/ABCD
похлинути/ABCD
похмелитися/BF
пошкребти/AB
презентувати/ABGH
приводити/ABCD
пригнути/ABEF
пригубитися/B
приземляти/IJGH
прикрасити/ABCD
прикупити/ABEF
приморожуватися/B
присвятити/ABEF
присвячувати/ABGH
присмажити/AB
присоромити/ABCD
притупити/ABEF
приходити/ABCDGH
причісувати/AB
пришивати/IJGH
провадити/ABCDGH
провітрити/ABEF
продовжувати/ABGH
проекзаменуватися/B
промочити/ABEF
промучити/ABCD
проносити/ABGH
проривати/IJGH
простелити/AB
прострочити/ABEF
просунути/ABCD
проціджувати/ABGH
проявити/ABEF
пружинити/AB
реєструвати/ABGH
реструктуризувати/AB
розархівовувати/ABGH
розбавити/ABCD
розвалити/ABEF
розводити/ABCDGH
розв'язати/AB
розгортати/IJGH
розділити/ABEF
розжарити/ABCD
розігрувати/ABGH
розкопувати/ABGH
розкрутити/ABEF
розкупорити/ABCD
розмальовуватися/B
розорити/ABEF
розплескувати/AB
розплющити/ABCD
розподіляти/IJGH
розрідити/ABEF
розслабити/ABCD
розслідувати/ABGH
розсовувати/AB
розсудити/ABEF
розтривожити/ABCD
розчепити/ABEF
розчищати/IJGH
роз'яснити/ABEF
самоочиститися/B
сварити/ABEFGH
сердити/ABD
сіяти/IJGH
скасовувати/ABGH
скоїти/ABCD
скопити/ABEF
скрутити/ABEF
скувати/AB
смажити/ABCDGH
сміятися/JH
спалахнути/ABEF
співпрацювати/ABGH
спізнюватися/B
сполучити/ABEF
спонукати/IJGH
спровадити/ABCD
спрогнозувати/AB
стелити/ABEFGH
стопити/ABEF
стрепенути/AB
стрічати/IJGH
судити/ABEFGH
схиляти/IJGH
схрестити/ABEF
схрещувати/AB
тарабанити/ABCD
тиснути/KLEFGHO
топити/ABEFGH
травмувати/ABGH
транслювати/ABGH
тривожити/ABCD
тулити/ABEFGH
тягати/IJGH
увімкнути/ABEF
ударити/ABCD
уквітчати/IJGH
уклинити/ABCD
уключити/ABEFGH
укопувати/AB
умістити/ABEF
уплести/AB
усвідомити/ABCD
усвідомлювати/ABGH
уставити/ABCD
утеплити/ABEF
утішити/ABCD
участити/ABEF
ушанувати/AB
ущемляти/IJGH
характеризувати/ABGH
хоронити/ABEF
храбрувати/AB
цінувати/ABGH
чванитися/BD
човгнути/ABEF
шарпати/IJGH
шкварити/AB
штрафувати/ABGH
